Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,135
Judgment against pretended corporation; costs.

In case judgment is rendered against a pretended, but not real, corporation, the costs may be collected from any person who has been acting as an officer or proprietor of such pretended corporation.

R.S.1867, Code § 718, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8342;

C.S.1922, § 9294;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,126;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,135.